Connecticut, session 2026, HB05537.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a working
group to study ways to fund a universal free school meals program that
would assist public schools to provide free breakfasts and lunches to all
public school students. The study shall examine (1) the amount of
funding projected to be required for such program, (2) possible sources
for funding, including, but not limited to, the imposition of a dedicated
tax or fee, (3) the parameters for the establishment of such program and
for disbursement of funds, and (4) any other matters relevant to the
establishment or funding of such program.
(b) The working group shall consist of (1) the chairpersons of the joint
standing committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding, education, children
and public health, (2) representatives of public schools and local or
regional boards of education, (3) public health or nutrition experts, and
(4) any other individuals or entities the chairpersons deem desirable or
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The members set
forth in subdivisions (2) to (4), inclusive, of this subsection shall be
appointed by the chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5537
revenue and bonding, not later than thirty days after the effective date
of this section.
(c) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance, revenue and
bonding shall serve as the chairpersons of the working group and shall
schedule the first meeting of the working group, which shall be held not
later than sixty days after the effective date of this section.
(d) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to finance,
revenue and bonding shall serve as administrative staff of the working
group.
(e) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
The working group shall terminate on the date that it submits such
report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
FIN Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2